Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-524
Health claim form; act, how cited.

Sections 44-524 to 44-530 shall be known and may be cited as the Standardized Health Claim Form Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 52.